Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. School Districts Operating Residential Schools.

Sec. 14.16.100.
Application for residential school.

Before establishing a residential school, a school district shall apply to the department for approval to establish and operate a statewide or district-wide residential school. The department shall accept applications during an open application period conducted annually. A period of open application in itself does not indicate that the department will approve the establishment of a new residential school.

History.

(§ 22 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 19 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “Before establishing a residential school, a school” for “A school”.

Effective dates. —

Section 62, ch. 15, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 14.16.200.
State funding for districts operating residential schools.

A district that operates a statewide or district-wide residential school for students in grades nine through 12 that has been approved by the department under regulations adopted by the board is eligible to receive a boarding stipend as reimbursement for the costs incurred by the district in operating that school. To be eligible for reimbursement for costs, a statewide or district-wide residential school operated by a district must provide a suitable student dormitory, food service, and daily access to a public school offering the appropriate grade level for a variable-length or 180-day school term as provided under AS

14.03.030

for the full school year.

Costs that may be claimed by a district for reimbursement under (a) of this section are

one round trip on the least expensive means of transportation between the student’s community of residence and the school during the school year if the district expends money for the trip; and

a per-pupil monthly stipend to cover room and board expenses as determined by the department on a regional basis and not to exceed the following amounts:

for the Southeast Region (Region I), $1,230;

for the Southcentral Region (Region II), $1,200;

for the Interior Region (Region III), $1,452;

for the Southwest Region (Region IV), $1,509;

for the Northern Remote Region (Region V), $1,776.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 48 SLA 2013.]

A district may cooperate with an Alaska Native organization, as defined in 20 U.S.C. 7546(2), or a nonprofit organization for the provision of room and board services to students enrolled in a statewide or district-wide residential school operated by a district under terms and conditions required for licensing in the state and as specified by the department in regulation.

In this section, “district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 48 SLA 2013; am § 23 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (b)(2) of this section sets per-pupil monthly stipends on a regional basis for each of five regions.
For school districts that comprise each of the regions, with per-pupil monthly stipend rates corresponding to the rates set out in each of subparagraphs (A) — (E) of paragraph (b)(2), see part IVB, “Payment Rates,” set out in the Boarding Home Program Application Instructions and Payment Rates Effective July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2006, form #05-96-022 of the Alaska Department of Education and Early Development.

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d) and relettered in 2011, at which time former subsection (c) was relettered as (d).

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e) and relettered in 2013.

Cross references. —

For reimbursement for room and board for fiscal years 2012 and 2013, see § 13, ch. 7, FSSLA 2011, in the 2011 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 15, SLA 2014, which amended (b) of this section, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Administrative Code. —

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, added (c).

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “A district that operates a statewide or district-wide residential school for students” for “A district that, before January 1, 2005, began operating a statewide residential educational program for students”, inserted “a boarding stipend as” following “eligible to receive”, substituted “school” for “program” at the end; in the second sentence substituted “a statewide or district-wide residential school operated by a district” for “the district-operated statewide residential educational program”, inserted “, food service,” following “suitable student dormitory”, and added “for a variable-length or 180-day school term as provided under AS

14.03.030

for the full school year” at the end; in (b)(2)(A), substituted “$820” for “$410”, in (b)(2)(B), substituted “$800” for “$400”, in (b)(2)(C), substituted “$968” for “$484”, in (b)(2)(D), substituted “$1,006” for “$503”, in (b)(2)(E), substituted “$1,184” for “$592”; repealed (c) and former (d)(2), defining “district-operated statewide residential educational program”; added (e) (now (d)).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(2), changed the amounts of the stipends as follows: in (b)(2)(A), from $820 to $1,230, in (b)(2)(B), from $800 to $1,200, in (b)(2)(C), from $968 to $1,452, in (b)(2)(D), from $1,006 to $1,509, and in (b)(2)(E), from $1,184 to $ 1,776.